lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_finalE-noHop.txt
!======================================
LEXICON NounInflVIII
!  for noun roots that end in -e
!    that can be dropped but not hopped
!======================================

!-------------------------------------------|
!               ABSOLUTIVE                  |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Abs.Sg]:^0                    PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.Pl]:^t                    PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.Du]:^k             PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Abs.1SgPoss.Sg]:^ka           PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Pl]:^nka          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Du]:^gka   PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.1PlPoss.Sg]:^vut          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Pl]:^put          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Du]:^gput  PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.1DuPoss.Sg]:^vung         PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Pl]:^pung         PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Du]:^gpung PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Abs.2SgPoss.Sg]:^n            PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^ten          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Du]:^gken  PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.2PlPoss.Sg]:^zi           PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Pl]:^si           PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Du]:^gsi   PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.2DuPoss.Sg]:^yek          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Pl]:^tek          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Du]:^gtek  PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nga  PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngi  PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Du]:^kek   PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngat PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngit PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Du]:^gket  PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngak PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngik PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Du]:^gkek  PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Abs.4SgPoss.Sg]:^ni           PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Pl]:^ni           PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Du]:^gni   PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.4PlPoss.Sg]:^yeng         PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Pl]:^teng         PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Du]:^gteng PostInflVIII;
^[Abs.4DuPoss.Sg]:^yek          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Pl]:^tek          PostInflVIII; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Du]:^gtek  PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
! %{%.f%.%} not included according to footnotes about no e hopping -> no e dropping [Jacobson (2001) p.36, p.38]

!--------------------------------------------|
!      RELATIVE (ergative & genitive)        |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^m                     PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.Pl]:^t                     PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.Du]:^k               PostInflVIII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Rel.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ma     PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ma     PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Du]:^gma     PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mta           PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mta           PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemta   PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtung         PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtung         PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtung PostInflVIII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Rel.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpek          PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpek          PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpek    PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesi         PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesi         PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesi   PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetek        PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetek        PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetek  PostInflVIII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Rel.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mi     PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mi     PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmi     PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeng   PostInflVIII;
^[Rel.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVIII; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmeng   PostInflVIII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------------|
!                 ABLATIVE MODALIS                  |
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng              PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}neng             PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^gneng                    PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mneng            PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mneng            PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemneng          PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnneng           PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnneng           PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnneng         PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegneng         PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegneng         PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegneng       PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpeneng          PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpeneng          PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpeneng          PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegneng         PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegneng         PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegneng         PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesineng        PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesineng        PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesineng        PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegneng       PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegneng       PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegneng       PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nganeng  PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}nganeng  PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkeneng          PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkeneng          PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mineng    PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mineng    PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmineng          PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggneng  PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggneng  PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggneng        PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megneng   PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megneng   PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegneng         PostInflVIII;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteneng PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteneng PostInflVIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegteneng       PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
! %{%.fL%.%} ^[Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!---------------------------------------------|
!            LOCATIVE (localis)               |
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mi              PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}ni             PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.Du]:^gni                    PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mni            PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mni            PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemni          PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnni           PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnni           PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnni         PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegni         PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegni         PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegni       PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpeni          PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpeni          PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpeni          PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegni         PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegni         PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegni         PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesini        PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesini        PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesini        PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegni       PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegni       PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegni       PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngani  PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngani  PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkeni          PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkeni          PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mini    PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mini    PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmini          PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggni  PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggni  PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggni        PostInflVIII;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megni   PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megni   PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegni         PostInflVIII;
